Hawaii statutes.
[§558-7] Personal property. In all
cases where the recorded instrument contains a provision defining and declaring
the interest of beneficiaries to be personal property only, the provision shall
be controlling for all purposes where the determination shall become an issue
under the laws or in the courts of this State. [L 1978, c 151, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next